Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-807
Acting judge; appointment.

The presiding judge of the court may appoint a judge of the court other than the judge of the conciliation court to act as judge of the conciliation court during any period when the judge of the conciliation court is on vacation, absent, or for any reason unable to perform his or her duties. Any judge so appointed shall have all of the powers and authority of a judge of the conciliation court in cases under the Conciliation Court Law.

Laws 1965, c. 228, § 7, p. 655;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 26.